District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-202.08

Merger and consolidation.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 208, 34 DCR 6856
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 5, 39 DCR 4863
July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 79, 41 DCR 3010
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1205(1), 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720

History

1981 Ed., § 41-428.

Prior Codifications